Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 509.3B Health savings accounts and qualified high-deductible health plans ââ cost sharing. If a copayment, coinsurance, or deductible paid as cost sharing by an enrollee under this chapter may result in the enrollee becoming ineligible for a health savings account associated with the enrolleeâs qualified high-deductible health plan under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code, the cost sharing shall apply only to the enrolleeâs qualified high-deductible health plan after the enrollee satisfies the enrolleeâs minimum deductible, except for items or services determined to be preventive care under section 223(c)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code. Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 514A.3C Health savings accounts and qualified high-deductible health plans ââ cost sharing. If a copayment, coinsurance, or deductible paid as cost sharing by an enrollee under this chapter may result in the enrollee becoming ineligible for a health savings account associated with the enrolleeâs qualified high-deductible health plan under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code, the cost sharing shall apply only to the enrolleeâs qualified House File 2185, p. 2 high-deductible health plan after the enrollee satisfies the enrolleeâs minimum deductible, except for items or services determined to be preventive care under section 223(c)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2185, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor